Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.380

Agent authority—Taxes.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to taxes authorizes the agent to:

(1) Prepare, sign, and file federal, state, local, and foreign income, gift, payroll, property, federal insurance contributions act, and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests for extension of time, petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related documents, including receipts, offers, waivers, consents, including consents and agreements under internal revenue code section 2032A, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A, as amended, closing agreements, and any power of attorney required by the internal revenue service or other taxing authority including, but not limited to, an internal revenue service form 2848 in favor of any third party with respect to a tax year upon which the statute of limitations has not run and the following twenty-five tax years;

(2) Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds, receive confidential information, and contest deficiencies determined by the internal revenue service or other taxing authority;

(3) Exercise any election available to the principal under federal, state, local, or foreign tax law; and

(4) Act for the principal in all tax matters for all periods before the internal revenue service, or other taxing authority.

[ 2016 c 209 s 215.]